Maine, session 132, LD1443.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §20-B is enacted to read:
§20-B. Continuation of contract payments; payment of expenses and interest
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "In good standing" means that a service provider has successfully complied with
the terms and conditions of its most recent contract with the department and has no
unresolved or outstanding compliance concerns.
B. "Previous contract rate" means the payment rate or structure established under the
most recent contract between a service provider and the department.
C. "Service provider" means an entity, including, but not limited to, a private or
nonprofit behavioral health agency, housing assistance provider or other nonprofit
organization that contracts with the department to provide services.
2. Continuation of contract payments during delays. The department shall continue
payments to a service provider in good standing at the service provider's previous contract
rate when a delay in contract awarding, finalization or payment of more than 30 calendar
days has occurred since the expiration of the previous contract.
3. Administrative expenses and interest charged to service providers accessing
lines of credit or loans. The department shall pay administrative expenses and interest
charged on lines of credit or loans accessed by a service provider when a delay in awarding,
finalization or payment of a department contract requires the service provider to access the
line of credit or loan.
Page 1 - 132LR1363(01)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.